New York, session 2025-2026, S3393.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6811-d 2 to read as follows: 3 § 6811-d. Notification of permanent pharmacy discontinuance. 1. Every 4 registered pharmacy that sells prescription drugs at retail shall 5 provide public notice at least thirty days prior to its permanent 6 discontinuance. Such notice shall: 7 (a) be provided, to the extent possible, to customers who have had a 8 prescription filled at the pharmacy within the year prior to its discon- 9 tinuance through the customer's primary means of communication with such 10 pharmacy; and 11 (b) be conspicuously posted at or adjacent to the place in the pharma- 12 cy where prescriptions are presented for compounding and dispensing, in 13 the waiting area for customers, or the area where prescribed drugs are 14 dispensed. 15 2. The notification required pursuant to subdivision one of this 16 section shall include, but not be limited to: 17 (a) the date of such pharmacy's discontinuance; 18 (b) the names, addresses, and phone numbers of the five nearest phar- 19 macies, including independently owned pharmacies, if applicable; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05757-03-5 S. 3393--A 2 1 (c) instructions on transferring any existing prescriptions to another 2 pharmacy; and 3 (d) information regarding the disposition of prescription records if a 4 customer fails to transfer a prescription prior to such pharmacy's 5 discontinuance. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 7 have become a law.